test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-iljeTS_gt-norm.yaml
  Noun - илʼ: # Noun 'life /(fin) elämä' - partial paradigm /Type 30/
     илʼ+N+Sg+Nom: илʼ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Acc: иламʼ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Gen: илаʼ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Dat: иландʼ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Loc: илӈгана
     илʼ+N+Sg+Abl: илӈгад
     илʼ+N+Sg+Pros: илмана
     илʼ+N+Du+Nom: илаӈгʼ
     илʼ+N+Du+Acc: илаӈгʼ
     илʼ+N+Du+Gen: илаӈгʼ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Nom: илаˮ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Acc: илъе
     илʼ+N+Pl+Gen: илъеˮ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Dat: илаӈгˮ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Loc: илӈгаˮна
     илʼ+N+Pl+Abl: илӈгат
     илʼ+N+Pl+Pros: илъеˮмна
     илʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: [илам, илми]
     илʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: [илам, илми]
     илʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: [илан, илни]
     илʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [илӈган, илӈгани]
     илʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: [илӈганан, илӈганани]
     илʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: [илӈгадан, илӈгадани, илӈгадни]
     илʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: [илманан, илманани]
     илʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: [илӈгаюн, илӈгаюни]
     илʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: [илӈгаюн, илӈгаюни]
     илʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: [илӈгаюн, илӈгаюни]
     илʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: [илъен, илъени]
     илʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: [илъен, илъени]
     илʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: [илъеˮн, илъеˮни]
     илʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: [илӈгаˮн, илӈгаˮни]
     илʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: [илӈгаˮнан, илӈгаˮнани]
     илʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: [илӈгатан, илӈгатани, илӈгатни]
     илʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: [илъеˮмнан, илъеˮмнани]
     илʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: илал
     илʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: иланд
     илʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: иланд
     илʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: илӈганд
     илʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: илӈгананд
     илʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: илӈгаданд
     илʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: илмананд
     илʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: илӈгаюд
     илʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg2: илӈгаюд
     илʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg2: илӈгают
     илʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: илъед
     илʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: илъед
     илʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: илъет
     илʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: илӈгат
     илʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: илӈгаˮнат
     илʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: илӈгатат
     илʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: илъеˮмнат
     илʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: [иланда, илнда]
     илʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: [иланда, илнда]
     илʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: [иланда, илнда]
     илʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: илӈганда
     илʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: илӈгананда
     илʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: илӈгаданда
     илʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: илмананда
     илʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: илӈгаюда
     илʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg3: илӈгаюда
     илʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg3: илӈгаюта
     илʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: илъеда
     илʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: илъеда
     илʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: илъета
     илʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: илӈгата
     илʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: илӈгаˮната
     илʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: [илӈгатата, илӈгатта]
     илʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: илъеˮмната
     илʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: илмиʼ
#     илʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1.2: илми
     илʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: илмиʼ
#     илʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1.2: илми
     илʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: илниʼ
#     илʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1.2: илни
     илʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: илӈганиʼ
#     илʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1.2: илӈгани
     илʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: илӈгананиʼ
#     илʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1.2: илӈганани
     илʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: [илӈгаданиʼ, илӈгадниʼ]
#     илʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1.2: [илӈгадани, илӈгадни]
     илʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: илмананиʼ
#     илʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1.2: илманани
     илʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: илӈгаюниʼ
#     илʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1.2: илӈгаюни
     илʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxDu1: илӈгаюниʼ
#     илʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1.2: илӈгаюни
     илʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxDu1: илӈгаюниʼ
#     илʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1.2: илӈгаюни
     илʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: илъениʼ
#     илʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1.2: илъени
     илʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: илъениʼ
#     илʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1.2: илъени
     илʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: илъеˮниʼ
#     илʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1.2: илъеˮни
     илʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: илӈгаˮниʼ
#     илʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1.2: илӈгаˮни
     илʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: илӈгаˮнаниʼ
#     илʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1.2: илӈгаˮнани
     илʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: [илӈгатаниʼ, илӈгатниʼ]
#     илʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1.2: [илӈгатани, илӈгатни]
     илʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: илъеˮмнаниʼ
#     илʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1.2: илъеˮмнани
     илʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: иллиʼ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: [иландиʼ, илндиʼ]
     илʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: [иландиʼ, илндиʼ]
     илʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: илӈгандиʼ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: илӈганандиʼ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: илӈгадандиʼ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: илманандиʼ
     илʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: илӈгаюдиʼ
     илʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxDu2: илӈгаюдиʼ
     илʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxDu2: илӈгаютиʼ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: илъедиʼ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: илъедиʼ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: илъетиʼ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: илӈгатиʼ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: илӈгаˮнатиʼ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: [илӈгататиʼ, илӈгаттиʼ]
     илʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: илъеˮмнатиʼ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: [иландиʼ, илндиʼ]
     илʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: [иландиʼ, илндиʼ]
     илʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: [иландиʼ, илндиʼ]
     илʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: илӈгандиʼ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: илӈганандиʼ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: илӈгадандиʼ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: илманандиʼ
     илʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: илӈгаюдиʼ
     илʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxDu3: илӈгаюдиʼ
     илʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxDu3: илӈгаютиʼ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: илъедиʼ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: илъедиʼ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: илъетиʼ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: илӈгатиʼ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: илӈгаˮнатиʼ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: [илӈгататиʼ, илӈгаттиʼ]
     илʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: илъеˮмнатиʼ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: илмаˮ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: илмаˮ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: илнаˮ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: илӈганаˮ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: илӈгананаˮ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: [илӈгаданаˮ, илӈгаднаˮ]
     илʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: илмананаˮ
     илʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: илӈгаюнаˮ
     илʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxPl1: илӈгаюнаˮ
     илʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxPl1: илӈгаюнаˮ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: илъенаˮ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: илъенаˮ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: илъеˮнаˮ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: илӈгаˮнаˮ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: илӈгаˮнанаˮ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: [илӈгатанаˮ, илӈгатнаˮ]
     илʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: илъеˮмнанаˮ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: иллаˮ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: [иландаˮ, илндаˮ]
     илʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: [иландаˮ, илндаˮ]
     илʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: илӈгандаˮ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: илӈганандаˮ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: илӈгадандаˮ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: илманандаˮ
     илʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: илӈгаюдаˮ
     илʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxPl2: илӈгаюдаˮ
     илʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxPl2: илӈгаютаˮ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: илъедаˮ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: илъедаˮ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: илъетаˮ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: илӈгатаˮ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: илӈгаˮнатаˮ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: [илӈгататаˮ, илӈгаттаˮ]
     илʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: илъеˮмнатаˮ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: [иландоʼ, илндоʼ]
     илʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: [иландоʼ, илндоʼ]
     илʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: [иландоʼ, илндоʼ]
     илʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: илӈгандоʼ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: илӈганандоʼ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: илӈгадандоʼ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: илманандоʼ
     илʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: илӈгаюдоʼ
     илʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxPl3: илӈгаюдоʼ
     илʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxPl3: илӈгаютоʼ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: илъедоʼ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: илъедоʼ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: илъетоʼ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: илӈгатоʼ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: илӈгаˮнатоʼ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: [илӈгататоʼ, илӈгаттоʼ]
     илʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: илъеˮмнатоʼ
     илʼ+N+Pred+Abs: иланд
     илʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: [иландав, илндав, иландув, илндув, иландами, илндами]
     илʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: [иландав, илндав, иландув, илндув, иландами, илндами]
     илʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: [иландан, илндан, иландани, илндани]
     илʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: [иландар, илндар]
     илʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: [иландамд, илндамд]
     илʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: [иланданд, илнданд]
     илʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: [иландада, илндада]
     илʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: [иландамда, илндамда]
     илʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: [иланданда, илнданда]
     илʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: [иландамиʼ, илндамиʼ]
#     илʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1.2: [иландами, илндами]
     илʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu1: [иландамиʼ, илндамиʼ]
#     илʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1.2: [иландами, илндами]
     илʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu1: [иланданиʼ, илнданиʼ]
#     илʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1.2: [иландани, илндани]
     илʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu2: [иландариʼ, илндариʼ]
     илʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu2: [иландамдиʼ, илндамдиʼ]
     илʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu2: [иландандиʼ, илндандиʼ]
     илʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu3: [иландадиʼ, илндадиʼ]
     илʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu3: [иландамдиʼ, илндамдиʼ]
     илʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu3: [иландандиʼ, илндандиʼ]
     илʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl1: [иландаваˮ, илндаваˮ]
     илʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl1: [иландаваˮ, илндаваˮ]
     илʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl1: [иланданаˮ, илнданаˮ]
     илʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl2: [иландараˮ, илндараˮ]
     илʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl2: [иландамдаˮ, илндамдаˮ]
     илʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl2: [иландандаˮ, илндандаˮ]
     илʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl3: [иландадоʼ, илндадоʼ]
     илʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl3: [иландамдоʼ, илндамдоʼ]
     илʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl3: [иландандоʼ, илндандоʼ]
     илʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: иландмʼ
     илʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: иланд
     илʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: илʼ
     илʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: илниʼ
     илʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: [иландиʼ, илндиʼ]
     илʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: илаӈгʼ
     илʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: илмаˮ
     илʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: [иландаˮ, илндаˮ]
     илʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: илаˮ
     илʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: [иландамзь, илндамзь]
     илʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: [иландась, илндась]
     илʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: иланзь
     илʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: илнинзь
     илʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: [иландинзь, илндинзь]
     илʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: илӈганзь
     илʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: илмаць
     илʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: [иландаць, илндаць]
     илʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: илаць
     илʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: илам
     илʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: илал
     илʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: [иланда, илнда]
     илʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: илмиʼ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: иллиʼ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: [иландиʼ, илндиʼ]
     илʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: илмаˮ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: иллаˮ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: [иландоʼ, илндоʼ]
     илʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: илмась
     илʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: иллась
     илʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: [иландась, илндась]
     илʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: илминзь
     илʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: иллинзь
     илʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: [иландинзь, илндинзь]
     илʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: илмаць
     илʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: иллаць
     илʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: [иландонзь, илндонзь]
     илʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: илӈгаюн
     илʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: илӈгаюд
     илʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: илӈгаюда
     илʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: илӈгаюниʼ
     илʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: илӈгаюдиʼ
     илʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: илӈгаюдиʼ
     илʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: илӈгаюнаˮ
     илʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: илӈгаюдаˮ
     илʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: илӈгаюдоʼ
     илʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: илӈгаюнась
     илʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: илӈгаюдась
     илʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: илӈгаюдась
     илʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: илӈгаюнинзь
     илʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: илӈгаюдинзь
     илʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: илӈгаюдинзь
     илʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: илӈгаюнаць
     илʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: илӈгаюдаць
     илʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: илӈгаюдонзь
     илʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: илъен
     илʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: илъед
     илʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: илъеда
     илʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: илъениʼ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: илъедиʼ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: илъедиʼ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: илъенаˮ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: илъедаˮ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: илъедоʼ
